pt-BR: Especialidade médica: Anestesia; EMS/paramédico; Medicina de emergência; Médico hospitalista; Terapia intensiva; Medicina interna; Enfermagem; Ginecologia e Obstetrícia; Ortopedia; Pediatria; Assistente médico; Terapia respiratória; Cirurgia; Tecnólogo cirúrgico; Trauma; Outro
ja: 医療専門分野: 麻酔; EMS/救急救命士; 救急医療; ホスピタリスト; 集中治療; 内科; 看護; 産婦人科医; 整形外科用; 小児用; 医師助手; 呼吸療法; 手術; 外科技師; トラウマ; その他
zh-TW: 醫學專科: 麻醉; 緊急醫療救護/救護人員; 急診醫學; 駐院醫師; 重症加護; 內科; 護理; 婦產科; 骨科; 兒科; 醫師助理; 呼吸治療; 手術; 手術技術師; 創傷; 其他
es: Especialidad médica: Anestesia; SEM/Paramédico; Medicina de emergencia; Médico hospitalista; Cuidados intensivos; Medicina interna; Enfermería; Obstetra/ginecólogo; Ortopedia; Pediatría; Asistente médico; Terapia respiratoria; Cirugía; Instrumentador quirúrgico; Trauma; Otros
nl: Medisch specialisme: Anesthesiologie; Ambulancemedewerker/Paramedicus; Spoedeisende geneeskunde; Ziekenhuisarts; Intensive care; Interne geneeskunde; Verpleging; Obstetrie/Gynaecologie; Orthopedie; Pediatrie; Doktersassistent; Ademtherapie; Chirurgie; OK-assistent; Traumatologie; Overig
bg-BG: Медицинска специалност: Анестезия; Спешна помощ/парамедик; Спешна медицина; Болничен лекар; Интензивно лечение; Вътрешна медицина; Медицински сестри; Акушер-гинеколог; Ортопедия; Педиатрия; Лекарски асистент; Респираторна терапия; Хирургия; Хирургичен технолог; Травма; Друго
lt-LT: Medicinos specialybė: Anestezija; Greitosios medicinos pagalbos skyrius / paramedikas; Skubioji medicina; Ligoninės gydytojas; Intensyvi priežiūra; Vidaus ligos; Slauga; Akušeris-ginekologas; Ortopedija; Pediatrija; Gydytojo padėjėjas; Kvėpavimo takų terapija; Chirurgija; Chirurgijos technologas; Trauma; Kita
fr: Spécialité médicale: Anesthésie; Service médical d’urgence/paramédical; Médecine d’urgence; Médecin hospitalier; Soins intensifs; Médecine interne; Infirmier; Gynécologue-obstétricien; Orthopédie; Pédiatrie; Assistant médical; Thérapie respiratoire; Chirurgie; Technicien en chirurgie; Traumatologie; Autre
hu: Orvosi szakterület: Érzéstelenítés; EMS/Mentős; Sürgősségi ellátás; Kórházi orvos; Intenzív ellátás; Belgyógyászat; Gondozás; Szülész/nőgyógyász; Ortopédia; Gyermekgyógyászat; Orvosasszisztens; Légzésterápia; Sebészet; Sebészeti technológus; Sérülés; Egyéb
th: ความเชี่ยวชาญทางการแพทย์: การวางยาสลบ; หน่วยแพทย์ฉุกเฉิน/พาราเมดิก; เวชศาสตร์ฉุกเฉิน; แพทย์ประจำโรงพยาบาล; การดูแลผู้ป่วยหนัก; อายุรศาสตร์; การพยาบาล; สูตินรีเวชวิทยา; ออร์โธปิดิกส์; กุมารเวชศาสตร์; ผู้ช่วยแพทย์; การบำบัดระบบทางเดินหายใจ; การผ่าตัด; นักเทคนิคการผ่าตัด; การบาดเจ็บ; อื่นๆ
da: Medicinsk speciale: Anæstesi; Ambulanceredder/paramediciner; Akutmedicin; Hospitalist; Intensiv pleje; Intern medicin; Sygepleje; Gynækolog/obstetrikslæge; Ortopædi; Pædiatri; Lægeassistent; Respiratorisk terapi; Kirurgi; Kirurgisk teknolog; Trauma; Andet
nb: Medisinsk spesialisering: Anestesi; Ambulansefag/paramedisin; Akuttmedisin; Sykehuslege; Intensivbehandling; Indremedisin; Sykepleie; Obstetrikk/gynekologi; Ortopedi; Pediatri; Legeassistent; Respiratorisk behandling; Kirurgi; Kirurgisk teknolog; Traume; Annet
sk-SK: Zdravotnícka špecializácia: Anestézia; Záchranár/Záchranár; Urgentná medicína; Hospitalista; Intenzívna starostlivosť; Interná medicína; Ošetrovateľstvo; Gynekológ/pôrodník; Ortopédia; Pediatria; Lekársky asistent; Respiračná terapia; Chirurgia; Chirurgický technológ; Úraz; Iná
pl: Specjalizacja medyczna: Anestezja; Ratownictwo medyczne; Medycyna ratunkowa; Hospitalista; Intensywna terapia; Medycyna wewnętrzna; Pielęgniarstwo; Położnictwo i ginekologia; Ortopedia; Pediatria; Lekarz-asystent; Terapia oddechowa; Chirurgia; Technik chirurgiczny; Urazy; Inne
zh-CN: 医疗专科: 麻醉科; 急救员/护理人员; 急诊科; 住院医师; 重症监护科; 内科; 护理部; 妇产科; 骨科; 儿科; 医师助理; 呼吸治疗科; 外科; 手术技师; 创伤科; 其他
tr: Tıbbi uzmanlık: Anestezi; Acil Tıp Hizmetleri/Paramedik; Acil tıp; Hastane uzmanı; Yoğun bakım; İç hastalıkları; Hemşirelik; Kadın Hastalıkları ve Doğum Uzmanı; Ortopedi; Pediyatri; Asistan doktor; Solunum terapisi; Ameliyat; Cerrahi teknisyeni; Travma; Diğer
el: Ιατρική ειδικότητα: Αναισθησία; Διασώστης/Πλήρωμα Ασθενοφόρου; Επείγουσα ιατρική; Νοσοκομειακός Ιατρός; Εντατική θεραπεία; Εσωτερική παθολογία; Νοσηλευτική; Μαιευτική/Γυναικολογία; Ορθοπαιδική; Παιδιατρική; Βοηθός ιατρού; Αναπνευστική θεραπεία; Χειρουργική; Τεχνολόγος χειρουργείου; Τραύμα; Λοιπά
pt-PT: Especialidade médica: Anestesiologista; Medicina de Urgência e Emergência/Paramédico; Medicina de emergência; Medicina Hospitalar; Cuidados intensivos; Medicina interna; Enfermagem; Ginecologia e Obstetrícia; Ortopedia; Pediatria; Assistente médico; Terapêutica respiratória; Cirurgia; Técnico cirúrgico; Trauma; Outro
ko: 의료 전문 분야: 마취; 응급의료서비스(EMS) / 구급대원; 응급의학; 입원 전담 전문의; 중환자 치료; 내과; 육아; 산부인과; 정형외과; 소아과; 진료 보조인력; 호흡기 치료; 외과; 수술 기술자; 외상; 기타
sv: Medicinsk specialitet: Anestesi; Ambulanssjukvårdare/Sjukvårdare; Akutmedicin; Sjukhusläkare; Intensivvård; Internmedicin; Amning; Gynekolog/OB; Ortopedisk; Pediatrisk; Läkarassistent; Andningsterapi; Kirurgi; Kirurgisk tekniker; Trauma; Övrigt
fi: Lääketieteellinen erikoisala: Anestesia; Ensihoitaja/Ensihoitaja; Ensiapulääketiede; Sairaalalääkäri; Tehohoito; Sisätaudit; Hoitotyö; Synnytys ja naistentaudit; Ortopedia; Pediatria; Lääkärin avustaja; Hengityshoito; Leikkaus; Kirurginen teknikko; Trauma; Muu
vi: Chuyên khoa y tế: Gây mê; Dịch vụ Cấp cứu Y tế (EMS)/Nhân viên cấp cứu y tế; Y học cấp cứu; Bác sĩ nội khoa điều trị nội trú; Hồi sức tích cực; Nội khoa; Điều dưỡng; Sản phụ khoa; Chỉnh hình; Nhi khoa; Trợ lý bác sĩ; Liệu pháp hô hấp; Phẫu thuật; Chuyên viên kỹ thuật phẫu thuật; Chấn thương; Khác
ro-RO: Specialitate medicală: Anestezie; Servicii medicale de urgență/paramedic; Medicină de urgență; Medic de spital; Terapie intensivă; Medicină internă; Infirmier; Medic obstetrician-ginecolog; Ortopedie; Pediatrie; Asistent medical; Terapie respiratorie; Chirurgie; Tehnician în chirurgie; Traumatologie; Altele
cs: Lékařská specializace: Anestézie; Zdravotnická záchranná služba / záchranář; Urgentní medicína; Nemocniční lékař; Intenzivní péče; Interní lékařství; Ošetřovatelství; Gynekologie/porodnictví; Ortopedie; Pediatrie; Lékařský asistent; Respirační terapie; Chirurgie; Chirurgický technolog; Trauma; Jiné
hr-HR: Medicinska specijalizacija: Anestezija; Hitna pomoć / bolničar hitne pomoći; Hitna medicina; Bolničar; Intenzivna njega; Interna medicina; Sestrinstvo; Ginekologija/opstetricija; Ortopedija; Pedijatrija; Liječnički asistent; Respiratorna terapija; Kirurgija; Kirurški tehničar; Traumatologija; Ostalo
ru: Медицинская специальность: Анестезиология; Скорая медицинская помощь; Медицина катастроф; Госпитальная терапия; Интенсивная терапия; Терапия; Сестринское дело; Акушерство и гинекология; Ортопедия; Педиатрия; Фельдшер; Респираторная терапия; Хирургия; Операционное дело; Травматология; Другое
de: Medizinisches Fachgebiet: Anästhesie; Rettungsdienst/Notfallsanitäter:in; Notfallmedizin; Krankenhausarzt; Intensivstation; Innere Medizin; Pflege; Gynäkologie; Orthopädie; Pädiatrie; Arztassistent; Atemtherapie; Operation; Operationstechniker; Trauma; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Medicinska specialnost: Anestezija; Reševalec; Nujna medicinska pomoč; Bolnišnični zdravnik; Intenzivna nega; Interna medicina; Zdravstvena nega; Porodničar/ginekolog; Ortopedija; Pediatrija; Zdravniški asistent; Respiratorna terapija; Kirurgija; Kirurški tehnolog; Travma; Drugo
it: specialità medica: Anestesia; EMS/Paramedico; Medicina d'urgenza; Medico ospedaliero; Terapia intensiva; Medicina interna; Infermieristica; Ostetricia/Ginecologia; Ortopedia; Pediatria; Assistente medico; Terapia respiratoria; Chirurgia; Tecnico chirurgico; Trauma; Altro
en: Medical specialty: Anesthesia; EMS/Paramedic; Emergency medicine; Hospitalist; Intensive care; Internal medicine; Nursing; OB/GYN; Orthopedics; Pediatrics; Physician assistant; Respiratory therapy; Surgery; Surgical technologist; Trauma; Other